Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 685.110 is amended to read:
685.110. The Oregon Board of Naturopathic Medicine may refuse to grant a license, may suspend
or revoke a license, may limit a license, may impose probation,  may issue a letter of reprimand and
may impose a civil penalty not to exceed $5,000 for each offense for any of the following reasons:
(1) [ Using fraud or deception in  securing ] Making misleading, deceptive or fraudulent re-
presentations in applying for  a license.
(2) Impersonating another physician.
(3) Practicing naturopathic medicine under an assumed name.
(4) Performing an abortion.
(5) Being convicted of a crime involving moral turpitude.
(6) Any other reason that renders the applicant or licensee unfit to perform the  duties of a
naturopathic physician.
(7) Being convicted of a crime relating to  practice of naturopathic medicine, unless the con-
viction is solely the result of providing a reproductive or gender-affirming  health care service that
is otherwise lawful in this state but unlawful  in the jurisdiction in which the person provided the
service,  so  long as the service provided was performed in accordance with the standard of care ap-
plicable to the service.
(8) Committing negligence related to the practice of naturopathic medicine.
(9) Having an impairment as defined in ORS 676.303.
(10) Prescribing or dispensing drugs outside the scope of practice.
(11) Obtaining a fee through fraud or misrepresentation.
(12) Committing gross or repeated malpractice.
(13) Representing to  a patient that a manifestly incurable condition of sickness, disease or injury
can be permanently cured.
(14) Engaging in any conduct or  practice contrary to a recognized standard of ethics of the
profession or any  conduct or practice that does or might constitute a danger to the health or safety
of a patient or  the public or any conduct, practice or condition that does or might adversely affect
a naturopathic physician’s ability [ safely and skillfully ] to practice naturopathic medicine  safely
and skillfully.
Enrolled House Bill 3042 (HB 3042-A) Page 1
(15) Willfully and consistently utilizing any  naturopathic service, X-ray equipment or treatment
contrary to recognized standards of practice of the naturopathic profession.
(16) Failing to notify the board within 30  days of a change in the location of practice or of
mailing address.
(17) Attempting to practice naturopathic medicine or practicing or claiming to practice
naturopathic medicine or  any of its components in this state without first complying with the pro-
visions of this chapter.
(18) Having a license  to practice naturopathic medicine in another jurisdiction suspended or
revoked, unless the suspension or revocation is solely  the result of providing a reproductive or
gender-affirming health care service that is otherwise lawful in this state but  unlawful in the juris-
diction in which the person provided the service, so long as  the service was performed in accord-
ance with the standard of care applicable to the service.
(19) Employing unlicensed persons to practice naturopathic medicine.
(20) Practicing natural childbirth without first obtaining a certificate of special competency.
(21) Failing to respond in a timely  manner to a request for information regarding a complaint
or the investigation of a complaint by the board.
(22) Failing to pay a civil penalty in the time specified by the order imposing the penalty.
(23) Engaging in sexual misconduct.
(24) Failing to maintain required confidentiality.
(25) Providing substandard care as a naturopathic physician through a  deliberate or
negligent act or failure to act, regardless of  whether injury to a patient occurs as a result
of the act or failure to act.
[(23)] (26) Violating any provision of this chapter or rules adopted by the board.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 685.225 is amended to read:
685.225. (1) Upon the complaint of a [ citizen] resident of  this state, or upon its own motion, the
Oregon Board of Naturopathic Medicine may investigate an alleged violation of this chapter.
(2) In conducting investigations, the board may:
(a) Take evidence;
(b) Take  depositions of witnesses, including the person under investigation, in the manner pre-
scribed by law for depositions in civil actions;
(c) Compel the appearance of witnesses, including the person under investigation, in the  manner
prescribed by law for appearances in civil actions;
(d) Require answers to interrogatories; and
(e) Compel the production of books, papers, accounts, documents or  testimony that pertains to
the matter under investigation.
(3) In exercising its authority under subsection (2) of this section, the  board or a designee of the
board may issue subpoenas.
SECTION 3.
(1) The amendments to ORS 685.110  and 685.225 by sections 1 and 2 of this
2025 Act become operative on January 1, 2026.
(2) The Oregon Board of Naturopathic Medicine may take any  action before the operative
date specified in subsection (1) of this section that is necessary to enable the board to  exer-
cise, on  and after the operative date specified in subsection (1) of this section, all of the du-
ties, functions and powers  conferred on the board by the amendments to ORS 685.110 and
685.225 by sections 1 and 2 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 4. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date  on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Enrolled House Bill 3042 (HB 3042-A) Page 2
Passed by House April 14, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate May 27, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 3042 (HB 3042-A) Page 3